District of Columbia statutes.
51-112

Review of Board’s decision.

Any person aggrieved by the decision of the Director may seek review of such decision in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 953, ch. 794, § 13
renumbered § 12, June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 118, ch. 117, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 155(c)(44)(C), 163(j)(2)
Dec. 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1617, Pub. L. 93-515, title III, § 301(2)
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 210, 40 DCR 5420
The District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, referred to in this section, is Chapter 5 of Title 2.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 210 of District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Comprehensive Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-260, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2330).
1973 Ed., § 46-312.
1981 Ed., § 46-113.
This section is referenced in § 47-4431, § 51-111, and § 51-119.
Judicial review by District of Columbia Court of Appeals, see § 2-510.